Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2474.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6304(f)(2)(i) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6304. Exclusions from child abuse.* * *(f) Child-on-child contact.--* * *(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the following shall apply:(i) Acts constituting any of the following crimes against a child shall be subject to the reporting requirements of this chapter:(A) rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape);12345678910111213141516171819 (B) involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse);(C) sexual assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault);(D) aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault);(E) indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3126 (relating to indecent assault); [and](F) indecent exposure as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3127 (relating to indecent exposure)[.];(G) unlawful dissemination of intimate image as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3131 (relating to unlawful dissemination of intimate image); and(H) sexual abuse of children as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).* * *Section 2. Section 6311(c) of Title 23 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6311. Persons required to report suspected child abuse.* * *(c) Staff members of institutions, etc.--Whenever a person is required to report under subsection (b) or (e) in the capacity as a member of the staff of a medical or other public or private institution, school, facility or agency, that person shall report immediately in accordance with section 6313 and shall immediately thereafter notify the person in charge of the institution, school, facility or agency or the designated agent 20260HB2474PN3323 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the person in charge. Upon notification, the person in charge or the designated agent, if any, shall facilitate the cooperation of the institution, school, facility or agency with the investigation of the report. Any intimidation, retaliation or obstruction in the investigation of the report is subject to the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4958 (relating to intimidation, retaliation or obstruction in child abuse cases). This chapter does not require more than one report from any such institution, school, facility or agency.(e) Additional reporting.--A mandated reporter enumerated in subsection (a) shall make a report via the Statewide toll-free telephone number under section 6332 (relating to establishment of Statewide toll-free telephone number) or by electronic submission under section 6305 (relating to electronic reporting) if the mandated reporter has reasonable cause to suspect the existence of child sexual abuse material or artificially generated child sexual abuse material as those terms are defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6312(g) (relating to sexual abuse of children). This subsection shall apply whether or not the material was created, displayed or exhibited to others by a minor. Upon receipt of a report under this subsection, the department shall transmit a copy of the report to the appropriate law enforcement agency and may transmit a copy of the report to the appropriate county agency.Section 3. This act shall take effect in one year.20260HB2474PN3323 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425